en: Green beans
bg: Зелен фасул
de: Grüne Bohnen
es: Judías verdes
fi: tuoreet vihreät pavut
fr: Haricots verts, Haricots verts extra fins
hr: Zeleni grah
hu: Zöldbab
it: Fagiolini
ja: サヤインゲン, インゲン, いんげん
nl: Sperziebonen, Groene bonen
pt: Feijões verdes
ru: Стручковая фасоль

en: Cooked French beans
fr: Haricots verts cuits

en: Fresh green beans
de: Frische grüne Bohnen
es: Judías verdes frescas
fr: Haricots verts frais
hr: Svježe zelene mahune

en: Fresh broad green beans
es: Judías verdes redondas

en: Fresh flat green beans
es: Judías verdes planas
fr: Haricots verts plats frais
hr: Svježe plosnate mahune
nl: Verse snijbonen

en: Fresh green pigeon peas
es: Gandules verdes frescos
fr: Pois d'Angole verts frais
hr: Svježi zeleni golubovi grašak
nl: Duiferwten

nl: Bruine bonen
fr: Haricots Bruns

en: Green peas, garden peas
bg: Зелен грах
de: Grüne Erbsen
es: Guisantes verdes
fi: Vihreät herneet
fr: Petits pois
hr: Zeleni grašak
it: Piselli verdi
ja: グリーンピース, えんどう豆, アオエンドウ
nl: Verse doperwten
pl: Groszek zielony, Groch zielony
ru: Зелёный горошек

en: Fresh green peas
bg: Пресен зелен грах
fr: Petits pois frais, petit pois frais
hr: Svježi zeleni grašak
pl: Groszek zielony świeży, Groch zielony świeży

en: Cooked garden peas
fr: Petits pois cuits

en: Legume seeds
bg: Семена от бобови култури
ca: Llavors de llegum
de: Hülsenfruchtsamen
es: Granos de leguminosas, Semillas de leguminosas
fi: palkokasvien siemenet
fr: Graines de légumineuses
hr: Sjemenke mahunarki
hu: Hüvelyes magok
it: Legumi
lt: Ankštinių augalų sėklos
nl: Bonenzaden
pt: Sementes de legumes
ru: Плоды бобовых
zh: 豆类种子

en: Alfalfa seeds, alfalfa seeds
es: Semillas de alfalfa
fr: Graines de alfalfa
hr: Sjeme lucerne
la: Medicago sativa
nl: Alfalfazaden
zh: 苜蓿种子

en: sprouted alfalfa seeds
fr: Graines de luzerne germées, Graines de luzerne cultivée

en: Pulses
ca: Llegums secs
de: Getrockenete Hülsenfrüchte
es: Legumbres secas
fi: Kuivattuja palkokasveja
fr: Légumineuses sèches, légumes secs
hr: Mahunarke
it: Legumi secchi
nl: Gedroogde bonen
pt: Pulsos
ru: Зернобобовые
zh: 干燥豆类

en: Cooked pulses
fr: Légumes secs cuits

en: Dried flageolet green beans
fr: Flageolets verts secs, Haricots flageolets verts secs

en: Cooked flageolet beans
fr: Flageolets cuits, Haricots flageolets cuits

en: Cooked flageolet green beans
fr: Flageolets verts cuits, Haricots flageolets verts cuits

en: Azuki beans, Adzuki beans
de: Adzukibohnen
es: Azukis
fr: Haricots azukis, Haricot adzukis
hr: Azuki grah
it: Fagioli Azuki
ja: 小豆
la: Vigna angularis
nl: Adukibonen

en: Dried peas
fr: Pois secs